Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1125
Departmental plan; contents.

The plan submitted by the department pursuant to section 71-1124 shall include the evaluation and recommendations of an independent mental health professional. The independent mental health professional may have been previously involved in evaluating the subject and advising the court pursuant to the Developmental Disabilities Court-Ordered Custody Act and may also be an employee of or a contractor with the department. The plan shall include: A history of the subject's past treatment, if any; a comprehensive evaluation of the subject's developmental disabilities; a risk analysis; the treatment and staffing requirements of the subject; appropriate terms and conditions to provide custody and treatment of the subject in the least restrictive alternative; and an appropriate treatment program that is capable of providing and willing to provide treatment in accordance with the plan.

Laws 2005, LB 206, § 25.